Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2514
Superficial thermal agent modalities, defined.

Superficial thermal agent modalities means hydrotherapy, whirlpool, cryotherapy, fluidotherapy, hot packs, paraffin, water, infrared, and other commercially available superficial heating and cooling technologies.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 854;

Laws 2025, LB257, § 11.